Yamls/Pron-nekoda_gt-norm.yaml
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: кӧднакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: [кӧднӧкӧ, кӧднӧскӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: кӧдналӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: кӧдналіськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: кӧдналӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: [кӧднӧнкӧ, кӧднаӧнкӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: кӧднакӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: кӧднакӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: [кӧдналакӧ, кӧднакӧла]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: [кӧднасякӧ, кӧднакӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: кӧднаынкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: кӧднаиськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: кӧднаӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: [кӧднакӧлань, кӧдналанькӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: [кӧднакӧсянь, кӧднасянькӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: кӧднаӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: кӧднаӧдзкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: [кӧднакӧви, кӧднавикӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: [кӧднакӧланьын, кӧдналаньынкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: [кӧднакӧланись, кӧдналаниськӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: [кӧднакӧланьӧ, кӧдналаньӧкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: [кӧднакӧланьсянь, кӧдналаньсянькӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: [кӧднакӧланьӧт, кӧдналаньӧткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: [кӧднакӧланьӧдз, кӧдналаньӧдзкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: [кӧднакӧланьви, кӧдналаньвикӧ]

##Pronoun – кӧда: # Interrogative Pronoun 'Kuka, joka / Кто, который'
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: кӧда
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: [кӧдӧ, кӧдӧс] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: кӧдалӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl: кӧдалісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat: кӧдалӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins: [кӧдӧн, кӧдаӧн] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: кӧдакӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car: кӧдатӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns: кӧдала
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr: кӧдася
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: кӧдаын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: кӧдаись
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: кӧдаӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr: кӧдалань
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr: кӧдасянь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl: кӧдаӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI: кӧдаӧдз
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII: кӧдави
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne: кӧдаланьын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla: кӧдаланись
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll: кӧдаланьӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr: кӧдаланьсянь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl: кӧдаланьӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI: кӧдаланьӧдз
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII: кӧдаланьви

    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кӧдаӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧс, кӧдӧс] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кӧдаӧлӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кӧдаӧлісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кӧдаӧлӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: кӧднам 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg1: кӧдаӧкӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg1: кӧдаӧтӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: кӧдаӧла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: кӧдаӧся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кӧдам
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кӧдсим
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кӧдам
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧлань, кӧдланям]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧсянь, кӧдсяням]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кӧдӧттям, кӧдӧттим]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кӧдӧдззам, кӧдӧдззим]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: кӧдаӧви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланьын, кӧдланям]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланись, кӧдланьсим]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланьӧ, кӧдланям]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланьсянь, кӧдланьсяням]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттям, кӧдланьӧттим]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззам, кӧдланьӧдззим] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: кӧдаӧланьви

    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кӧдыт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: кӧдтӧ 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кӧдытлӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: кӧдытлісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: кӧдытлӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: кӧднат 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg2: кӧдыткӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg2: кӧдыттӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: кӧдытла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: кӧдытся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: кӧдат
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: кӧдсит
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кӧдат
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [кӧдытлань, кӧдланят]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [кӧдытсянь, кӧдсянят]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [кӧдӧттят, кӧдӧттит]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [кӧдӧдззат, кӧдӧдззит]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: кӧдытви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [кӧдытланьын, кӧдланят]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [кӧдытланись, кӧдланьсит]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [кӧдытланьӧ, кӧдланят]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кӧдытланьсянь, кӧдланьсянят]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кӧдытланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттят, кӧдланьӧттит]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кӧдытланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззат, кӧдланьӧдззит] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: кӧдытланьви


    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кӧдыс
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: кӧдсӧ 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кӧдыслӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: кӧдыслісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кӧдыслӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: кӧднас 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg3: кӧдыскӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg3: кӧдыстӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: кӧдысла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: кӧдысся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: кӧдас
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: кӧдсис
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кӧдас
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [кӧдыслань, кӧдланяс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [кӧдыссянь, кӧдсяняс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [кӧдӧттяс, кӧдӧттис]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [кӧдӧдззас, кӧдӧдззис]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: кӧдысви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [кӧдысланьын, кӧдланяс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [кӧдысланись, кӧдланьсис]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [кӧдысланьӧ, кӧдланяс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кӧдысланьсянь, кӧдланьсяняс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кӧдысланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттяс, кӧдланьӧттис]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кӧдысланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззас, кӧдланьӧдззис] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: кӧдысланьви


    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: кӧдным
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: кӧднымӧс 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: кӧднымлӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: кӧднымлісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: кӧднымлӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧн, кӧднаным] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl1: кӧднымкӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl1: кӧднымтӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: кӧднымла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: кӧднымся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: кӧднымын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: [кӧднымись, кӧдсиным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кӧднымӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [кӧднымлань, кӧдланяным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [кӧднымсянь, кӧдсяняным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧт, кӧдӧттяным, кӧдӧттиным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧдз, кӧдӧдззаным, кӧдӧдззиным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: кӧднымви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [кӧднымланьын, кӧдланяным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [кӧднымланись, кӧдланьсиным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [кӧднымланьӧ, кӧдланяным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кӧднымланьсянь, кӧдланьсяняным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кӧднымланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттяным, кӧдланьӧттиным]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кӧднымланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззаным, кӧдланьӧдззиным] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: кӧднымланьви


    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: кӧдныт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: кӧднытӧ 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: кӧднытлӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: кӧднытлісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: кӧднытлӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧн, кӧднаныт] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl2: кӧдныткӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl2: кӧдныттӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: кӧднытла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: кӧднытся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: кӧднытын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: [кӧднытісь, кӧдсиныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кӧднытӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [кӧднытлань, кӧдланяныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [кӧднытсянь, кӧдсяняныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧт, кӧдӧттяныт, кӧдӧттиныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧдз, кӧдӧдззаныт, кӧдӧдззиныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: кӧднытви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [кӧднытланьын, кӧдланяныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [кӧднытланись, кӧдланьсиныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [кӧднытланьӧ, кӧдланяныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кӧднытланьсянь, кӧдланьсяняныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кӧднытланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттяныт, кӧдланьӧттиныт]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кӧднытланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззаныт, кӧдланьӧдззиныт] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: кӧднытланьви


    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кӧдныс
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: кӧднысӧ 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кӧдныслӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: кӧдныслісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: кӧдныслӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧн, кӧднаныс] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl3: кӧдныскӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl3: кӧдныстӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: кӧднысла
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: кӧднысся
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кӧднысын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: [кӧднысісь, кӧдсиныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кӧднысӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [кӧдныслань, кӧдланяныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [кӧдныссянь, кӧдсяняныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧт, кӧдӧттяныс, кӧдӧттиныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧдз, кӧдӧдззаныс, кӧдӧдззиныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: кӧднысви
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [кӧднысланьын, кӧдланяныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [кӧднысланись, кӧдланьсиныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [кӧднысланьӧ, кӧдланяныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кӧднысланьсянь, кӧдланьсяняныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кӧднысланьӧт, кӧдланьӧттяныс, кӧдланьӧттиныс]
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кӧднысланьӧдз, кӧдланьӧдззаныс, кӧдланьӧдззиныс] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: кӧднысланьви


    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: кӧдна
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: [кӧднӧ, кӧднӧс] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: кӧдналӧн
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl: кӧдналісь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat: кӧдналӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ins: [кӧднӧн, кӧднаӧн] 
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: кӧднакӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Car: кӧднатӧг
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Cns: кӧднала
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Cmpr: кӧднася
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: кӧднаын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: кӧднаись
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: кӧднаӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Apr: кӧдналань
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Egr: кӧднасянь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+Prl: кӧднаӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+TerI: кӧднаӧдз
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+TerII: кӧднави
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprIne: кӧдналаньын
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprEla: кӧдналанись
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprIll: кӧдналаньӧ
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprEgr: кӧдналаньсянь
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprPrl: кӧдналаньӧт
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprTerI: кӧдналаньӧдз
    кӧда+Pron+Interr+Pl+AprTerII: кӧдналаньви
